Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-405
Reciprocal demurrage; annual agreement.

Every railroad carrier which operates lines within this state shall make an annual agreement with each shipper that receives or sends ten or more cars annually which provides the terms under which reciprocal demurrage charges shall be made on the part of the railroad carrier or shipper. Such terms shall be equal for all shippers. Any agreement made under this section shall control the relation between the parties thereto, the provisions of sections 75-401 to 75-430 to the contrary notwithstanding. Monthly settlements may be entered into, but all credits due a shipper for the current month shall be carried to the shipper's credit for the succeeding month, except that at the termination of the agreement, any credits due the shipper shall be eliminated.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 5, p. 1399;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 85.